Illinois, session 104th, HB4988.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)7    Sec. 2MMMM. Warnings on generative artificial intelligence 8systems.9    (a) As used in this section:10    "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system 11that, for explicit or implicit objectives, infers, from the 12input it receives, how to generate outputs, such as 13predictions, content, recommendations, or decisions that can 14influence physical or virtual environments. "Artificial 15intelligence" includes generative artificial intelligence.16    "Generative artificial intelligence" means an automated 17computing system that, when provided with human prompts, 18descriptions, or queries, can produce outputs that simulate 19human-produced content, including, but not limited to, the 20following:21        (1) textual outputs, such as short answers, essays, 22    poetry, or longer compositions or answers;23        (2) image outputs, such as fine art, photographs,   HB4988- 2 -LRB104 18888 SPS 32333 b1    conceptual art, diagrams, and other images;2        (3) multimedia outputs, such as audio or video in the 3    form of compositions, songs, or short-form or long-form 4    audio or video; and5        (4) other content that would otherwise be produced by 6    human means.7    "Generative artificial intelligence system" means any 8artificial intelligence system whose primary function is to 9generate content, including, but not limited to, code, text, 10and images.11    (b) The owner, licensee, or operator of a generative 12artificial intelligence system shall conspicuously display a 13warning on the system's user interface that is reasonably 14similar to the following warning:15        "WARNING: Artificial intelligence does not think. 16    Artificial intelligence generates responses by recognizing 17    patterns in large amounts of text data. Artificial 18    intelligence can produce fluent, seemingly coherent 19    answers across various topics. Artificial intelligence 20    does not understand meaning, have genuine knowledge of the 21    world, or possess communicative intent. Artificial 22    intelligence responses are assembled by statistically 23    predicting likely word sequences based on language it has 24    seen before. Artificial intelligence can generate 25    confident-sounding responses that contain errors, 26    inaccuracies, or fabricated information."  HB4988- 3 -LRB104 18888 SPS 32333 b1    (c) Each day the warning required under subsection (b) is 2not displayed by the owner, licensee, or operator of a 3generative artificial intelligence system constitutes a 4separate violation of the Act. 5    (d) A violation of this Section constitutes an unlawful 6practice within this meaning of this Act.